Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.172

Evidence summary and stipulations.

(1) Prior to serving a statement of charges under RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170, the disciplinary [disciplining] authority may furnish a statement of allegations to the licensee along with a detailed summary of the evidence relied upon to establish the allegations and a proposed stipulation for informal resolution of the allegations. These documents shall be exempt from public disclosure until such time as the allegations are resolved either by stipulation or otherwise.

(2) The disciplinary [disciplining] authority and the licensee may stipulate that the allegations may be disposed of informally in accordance with this subsection. The stipulation shall contain a statement of the facts leading to the filing of the complaint; the act or acts of unprofessional conduct alleged to have been committed or the alleged basis for determining that the licensee is unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety; a statement that the stipulation is not to be construed as a finding of either unprofessional conduct or inability to practice; an acknowledgment that a finding of unprofessional conduct or inability to practice, if proven, constitutes grounds for discipline under this chapter; and an agreement on the part of the licensee that the sanctions set forth in RCW 18.130.160, except RCW 18.130.160 (1), (2), (6), and (8), may be imposed as part of the stipulation, except that no fine may be imposed but the licensee may agree to reimburse the disciplinary [disciplining] authority the costs of investigation and processing the complaint up to an amount not exceeding one thousand dollars per allegation; and an agreement on the part of the disciplinary [disciplining] authority to forego further disciplinary proceedings concerning the allegations. A stipulation entered into pursuant to this subsection shall not be considered formal disciplinary action.

(3) If the licensee declines to agree to disposition of the charges by means of a stipulation pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the disciplinary [disciplining] authority may proceed to formal disciplinary action pursuant to RCW 18.130.090 or 18.130.170.

(4) Upon execution of a stipulation under subsection (2) of this section by both the licensee and the disciplinary [disciplining] authority, the complaint is deemed disposed of and shall become subject to public disclosure on the same basis and to the same extent as other records of the disciplinary [disciplining] authority. Should the licensee fail to pay any agreed reimbursement within thirty days of the date specified in the stipulation for payment, the disciplinary [disciplining] authority may seek collection of the amount agreed to be paid in the same manner as enforcement of a fine under RCW 18.130.165.

[ 2008 c 134 s 24; 2000 c 171 s 29; 1993 c 367 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.